Washington statutes.
RCW 11.76.040

Time and place of hearing—Notice.

When such final report and petition for distribution, or either, has been filed, the court, or the clerk of the court, shall fix a day for hearing it which must be at least twenty days subsequent to the day of the publication as hereinafter provided. Notice of the time and place fixed for the hearing shall be given by the personal representative by publishing a notice thereof in a legal newspaper published in the county for one publication at least twenty days preceding the time fixed for the hearing. It shall state in substance that a final report and petition for distribution have, or either thereof has, been filed with the clerk of the court and that the court is asked to settle such report, distribute the property to the heirs or persons entitled thereto, and discharge the personal representative, and it shall give the time and place fixed for the hearing of such final report and petition and shall be signed by the personal representative or the clerk of the court.

Whenever a final report and petition for distribution, or either, shall have been filed in the estate of a decedent and a day fixed for the hearing of the same, the personal representative of such estate shall, not less than twenty days before the hearing, cause to be mailed a copy of the notice of the time and place fixed for hearing to each heir, legatee, devisee and distributee whose name and address are known to him or her, and proof of such mailing shall be made by affidavit and filed at or before the hearing.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2063; 1969 c 70 s 3; 1965 c 145 s 11.76.040. Prior: 1955 c 205 s 13; 1919 c 31 s 1; 1917 c 156 s 162; RRS s 1532. FORMER PART OF SECTION: re Notice of appointment as personal representative, now codified as RCW 11.28.237.]

NOTES:

Request for special notice of proceedings in probate—Prohibitions: RCW 11.28.240.